North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Article 11. Merger and Share Exchange.
§ 55-11-12.
Merger between parent unincorporated entity and subsidiary corporation or corporations.

Subject to the other provisions of this section and Article 9 of this Chapter, a parent unincorporated entity owning shares of a domestic subsidiary corporation that carry at least ninety percent (90%) of the voting power of each class and series of the outstanding shares of the subsidiary corporation and that have the power to vote in the election of directors at the time of a merger under this section may merge the subsidiary corporation or corporations into itself, or merge itself and one or more subsidiary corporations into another subsidiary corporation, without approval of the board of directors or shareholders of the subsidiary corporation or corporations, unless the articles of incorporation for the subsidiary corporation or corporations require approval of the shareholders of the subsidiary corporation or corporations, if both of the following requirements are met:

The merger is permitted by the laws of the state or country governing the organization and internal affairs of each merging business entity.

Each merging business entity complies with the requirements of this section and, to the extent applicable, the laws referred to in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

If any shareholder of the domestic subsidiary corporation, other than the parent unincorporated entity, has or will have personal liability for any existing or future obligation of the surviving business entity solely as a result of holding an interest in the surviving business entity, then the plan of merger under subsection (a) of this section shall require the affirmative approval, by vote or written consent, of that shareholder.

If the parent unincorporated entity does not own all the outstanding stock of the subsidiary corporation, the surviving business entity shall, within 10 days after the effective date of the merger, notify each shareholder of the subsidiary corporation as of the effective date of the merger, that the merger has become effective.

The surviving business entity shall deliver articles of merger to the Secretary of State for filing. The articles of merger shall set forth all of the following:

For each merging business entity, its name, type of business entity, and the state or country whose laws govern its organization and internal affairs.

The terms and conditions of the merger.

The manner and basis of converting the interests in each merging business entity into interests, obligations, or securities of the surviving business entity, or into cash or other property in whole or in part, or of cancelling the interests.

The name of the merging business entity that shall survive the merger and, if the surviving business entity is not authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, a designation of its mailing address and a commitment to file with the Secretary of State a statement of any subsequent change in its mailing address.

If the surviving business entity is a domestic corporation, any amendment to its articles of incorporation as provided in a plan of merger or board resolution.

The provisions of the articles of merger may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the articles of merger if the articles of merger set forth the manner in which the facts will operate upon the affected provisions. The facts may include any of the following:

Statistical or market indices, market prices of any security or group of securities, interest rates, currency exchange rates, or similar economic or financial data.

A determination or action by the corporation or by any other person, group, or body.

The terms of, or actions taken under, an agreement to which the corporation is a party, or any other agreement or document.

A merger takes effect when the articles of merger become effective.

History.

2018-45, s. 23.

North Carolina Commentary

Under the North Carolina Business Corporation Act, the general rule is that a North Carolina corporation may merge with another corporation upon approval by the boards of directors and shareholders of each constituent corporation. However, where a parent corporation holds at least 90% of each class of outstanding stock of a subsidiary corporation, the parent corporation and subsidiary corporation may merge without a vote of the board of directors or shareholders of the subsidiary and, where the parent is the surviving corporation of the merger and its articles of incorporation are not being amended in connection with the merger, without a vote of the shareholders of the parent corporation. This simplified merger approval process for 90% or more owned subsidiaries permitted by the North Carolina Business Corporation Act is commonly referred to as a “Short-Form Merger.” This section was added, effective as of October 1, 2018, to extend the Short-Form Merger process to any type of parent business entity.

§ 55-11-13.
Effect of merger with unincorporated entity.

Upon taking effect, a merger pursuant to

G.S. 55-11-10

or 55-11-12 shall have all of the following effects:

Each other merging business entity merges into the surviving business entity, and the separate existence of each merging business entity, except the surviving business entity, ceases.

The title to all real estate and other property owned by each merging business entity is vested in the surviving business entity without reversion or impairment.

The surviving business entity has all liabilities of each merging business entity.

A proceeding pending by or against any merging business entity may be continued as if the merger did not occur, or the surviving business entity may be substituted in the proceeding for a merging business entity whose separate existence ceases in the merger.

If a domestic corporation is the surviving business entity, its articles of incorporation shall be amended to the extent provided in the articles of merger.

The interests in each merging business entity that are to be converted into interests, obligations, or securities of the surviving business entity, or into the right to receive cash or other property, are thereupon so converted, and the former holders of the interests are entitled only to the rights provided to them in the plan of merger, resolution, or, in the case of former holders of shares in a domestic corporation, any rights they may have under Article 13 of this Chapter.

If the surviving business entity is not a domestic corporation, the surviving business entity is deemed to agree that it will promptly pay to the shareholders of any merging domestic corporation exercising appraisal rights the amount, if any, to which they are entitled under Article 13 of this Chapter and otherwise to comply with the requirements of Article 13 of this Chapter as if it were a surviving domestic corporation in the merger.

The merger shall not affect the liability or absence of liability of any holder of an interest in a merging business entity for any acts, omissions, or obligations of any merging business entity made or incurred prior to the effectiveness of the merger. The cessation of separate existence of a merging business entity in the merger shall not constitute a dissolution or termination of the merging business entity.

If the surviving business entity is not a domestic limited liability company, a domestic corporation, a domestic nonprofit corporation, or a domestic limited partnership, when the merger takes effect the surviving business entity is deemed to have done both of the following:

Agreed that it may be served with process in this State in any proceeding for enforcement of (i) any obligation of any merging domestic limited liability company, domestic corporation, domestic nonprofit corporation, domestic limited partnership, or other partnership as defined in

G.S. 59-36

that is formed under the laws of this State, (ii) the appraisal rights of shareholders of any merging domestic corporation under Article 13 of this Chapter, and (iii) any obligation of the surviving business entity arising from the merger.

Appointed the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process in the proceeding. Service on the Secretary of State of process shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the Secretary of State, or with any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process, duplicate copies of the process and the fee required by G.S. 55-1-22(b). Upon receipt of service of process on behalf of a surviving business entity in the manner provided for in this section, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the surviving business entity. If the surviving business entity is authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, the address for mailing shall be its principal office designated in the latest document filed with the Secretary of State that is authorized by law to designate the principal office or, if there is no principal office on file, its registered office. If the surviving business entity is not authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, the address for mailing shall be the mailing address designated pursuant to G.S. 55-11-10(c)(2) or G.S. 55-11-12(d)(4).

History.

2018-45, s. 23.

§§ 55-11-14 through 55-11-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 55-11-20.
Merger to effect a holding company reorganization.

The following definitions apply in this section:

“Company official” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 57D-1-03

.

“Constituent corporation” means the original corporation incorporated under the laws of this State or limited liability company organized under the laws of this State that is a party to a merger that is intended to create a holding company structure under a plan of merger that satisfies the requirements of this section.

“Holding company” means a corporation incorporated under the laws of this State or limited liability company organized under the laws of this State that from its incorporation or organization until consummation of a merger governed by this section was at all times a direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiary of the constituent corporation and whose capital stock is issued in the merger.

“Manager” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 57D-1-03

.

“Organizational documents” means the articles of incorporation of a corporation or the articles of organization of a limited liability company.

“Surviving entity” means the corporation incorporated under the laws of this State or limited liability company organized under the laws of this State that is the surviving entity in a merger of a constituent corporation with or into a single direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiary of the constituent corporation, which immediately following the merger is a direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiary of the holding company.

Notwithstanding the requirements of

G.S. 55-11-03

, unless expressly required by its articles of incorporation, no vote of shareholders of a constituent corporation is required to authorize a merger with or into a single direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiary of the constituent corporation if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

The constituent corporation and the direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiary of the constituent corporation are the only constituent entities to the merger.

Each share or fraction of a share of the capital stock of the constituent corporation outstanding immediately prior to the effective time of the merger is converted in the merger into a share or equal fraction of a share of capital stock of a holding company having the same designations, rights, powers, and preferences, and the qualifications, limitations, and restrictions thereof, as the share or fraction of a share of the capital stock of the constituent corporation being converted in the merger.

The holding company and the constituent corporation are both corporations of this State and the direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiary that is the other constituent entity to the merger is a corporation or limited liability company of this State.

The articles of incorporation and bylaws of the holding company immediately following the effective time of the merger contain provisions identical to the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the constituent corporation immediately prior to the effective time of the merger other than provisions, if any, regarding any of the following:

The incorporator or incorporators.

The corporate name.

The registered office and agent.

The initial board of directors and the initial subscribers for shares.

Any provisions contained in any amendment to the articles of incorporation that were necessary to effect a change, exchange, reclassification, subdivision, combination, or cancellation of stock, if the change, exchange, reclassification, subdivision, combination, or cancellation has become effective.

As a result of the merger the constituent corporation or its successor becomes or remains a direct or indirect wholly owned subsidiary of the holding company.

The directors of the constituent corporation become or remain the directors of the holding company upon the effective time of the merger.

Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the organizational documents of the surviving entity immediately following the effective time of the merger contain provisions identical to the articles of incorporation of the constituent corporation immediately prior to the effective time of the merger other than provisions, if any, regarding any of the following:

The incorporator or incorporators.

The corporate or entity name.

The registered office and agent.

The initial board of directors and the initial subscribers for shares.

References to members rather than stockholders or shareholders.

References to interests, units, or other similar terms rather than stock or shares.

References to managers, managing members, or other members of the governing body rather than directors.

Any provisions contained in any amendment to the articles of incorporation that were necessary to effect a change, exchange, reclassification, subdivision, combination, or cancellation of stock, if the change, exchange, reclassification, subdivision, combination, or cancellation has become effective.

The shareholders of the constituent corporation do not recognize gain or loss for United States federal income tax purposes as determined by the board of directors of the constituent corporation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (7) of subsection (b) of this section, if the organizational documents of the surviving entity do not contain the following provisions, they shall be amended in the merger to contain provisions requiring all of the following:

Any act or transaction by or involving the surviving entity, other than the election or removal of directors or managers, managing members, or other members of the governing body of the surviving entity, that requires for its adoption under this Chapter or its organizational documents the approval of the shareholders or members of the surviving entity shall, by specific reference to this subsection, require, in addition, the approval of the shareholders of the holding company, or any successor by merger, by the same vote as is required by this Chapter or by the organizational documents of the surviving entity. For purposes of this subdivision, any surviving entity that is not a corporation shall include in the amendment a requirement that the approval of the shareholders of the holding company be obtained for any act or transaction by or involving the surviving entity, other than the election or removal of directors or managers, managing members, or other members of the governing body of the surviving entity, which would require the approval of the shareholders of the surviving entity if the surviving entity were a corporation subject to this Chapter.

Any amendment of the organizational documents of a surviving entity that is not a corporation that would, if adopted by a corporation subject to this Chapter, be required to be included in the articles of incorporation of the corporation shall, by specific reference to this subsection, require, in addition, the approval of the shareholders of the holding company, or any successor by merger, by the same vote as is required by this Chapter or by the organizational documents of the surviving entity.

The business and affairs of a surviving entity that is not a corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of a board of directors, board of managers, or other governing body consisting of individuals who are subject to the same fiduciary duties applicable to, and who are liable for breach of those duties to the same extent as, directors of a corporation subject to this Chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (7) of subsection (b) of this section, the organizational documents of the surviving entity may be amended in the merger to reduce the number of classes and shares of capital stock or other equity interests or units that the surviving entity is authorized to issue and to eliminate any provision authorized by

G.S. 55-8-06

.

Neither subsection (c) of this section nor any provision of a surviving entity’s organizational documents required by this section shall be deemed or construed to require approval of the shareholders of the holding company to elect or remove directors or managers, managing members, or other members of the governing body of the surviving entity.

From and after the effective time of a merger adopted by a constituent corporation by action of its board of directors and without any vote of shareholders pursuant to this section, the following provisions apply:

To the extent the restrictions of Articles 9 and 9A of this Chapter applied to the constituent corporation and its shareholders at the effective time of the merger, such restrictions shall apply to the holding company and its shareholders immediately after the effective time of the merger as though it were the constituent corporation.

If the corporate name of the holding company immediately following the effective time of the merger is the same as the corporate name of the constituent corporation immediately prior to the effective time of the merger, the shares of capital stock of the holding company into which the shares of capital stock of the constituent corporation are converted in the merger shall be represented by the stock certificates that previously represented shares of capital stock of the constituent corporation.

To the extent a shareholder of the constituent corporation immediately prior to the merger had standing to institute or maintain derivative litigation on behalf of the constituent corporation, nothing in this section limits or extinguishes that standing.

If a plan of merger is adopted by a constituent corporation by action of its board of directors and without any vote of shareholders pursuant to this section, but otherwise in accordance with

G.S. 55-11-01

, the secretary or assistant secretary of the constituent corporation shall certify on the plan of merger that the plan has been adopted pursuant to this section and that the conditions specified in subsection (b) of this section have been satisfied. This certification on the plan of merger is not required if a certificate of merger or consolidation is registered in lieu of filing the plan of merger. The plan so adopted and certified shall then be filed and become effective, in accordance with

G.S. 55-11-05

. That filing is a representation by the person who executes the agreement that the facts stated in the certificate remain true immediately prior to the filing.

Except as otherwise provided in this section:

The provisions of G.S. 55-11-06(a) and G.S. 55-11-06(c) shall apply to any merger effected pursuant to this section.

The provisions of Article 13 of this Chapter shall not apply to any merger effected pursuant to this section.

History.

2014-102, s. 6(a); 2018-45, s. 22.